Washington statutes.
RCW 9.95.064

Conditions of release.

(1) In order to minimize the trauma to the victim, the court may attach conditions on release of an offender under RCW 9.95.062, convicted of a crime committed before July 1, 1984, regarding the whereabouts of the defendant, contact with the victim, or other conditions.

(2) Offenders released under RCW 9.95.420 are subject to crime-related prohibitions and affirmative conditions established by the court, the department of corrections, or the board pursuant to RCW * 9.94A.712, 9.94A.704, 72.09.335, and 9.95.420 through 9.95.440.

[ 2008 c 231 s 41; 2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 s 326; 1989 c 276 s 4.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 9.94A.712 was recodified as RCW 9.94A.507 pursuant to the direction found in section 56(4), chapter 231, Laws of 2008, effective August 1, 2009.

Intent—Application—Application of repealers—Effective date—2008 c 231: See notes following RCW 9.94A.701.

Severability—2008 c 231: See note following RCW 9.94A.500.

Intent—Severability—Effective dates—2001 2nd sp.s. c 12: See notes following RCW 71.09.250.

Application—2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 ss 301-363: See note following RCW 9.94A.030.

Severability—1989 c 276: See note following RCW 9.95.062.